Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-39] Notice and service of protective
order. (a) A protective order issued pursuant to section 587A-38 shall be
served either personally or by certified mail on each party to be restrained.
In the case where a party was present at the hearing during which the
protective order was issued, that party shall be deemed to have notice of the
order.

(b) The court may order the police department
to serve a protective order issued pursuant to section 587A-38 upon each party
to be restrained, to accompany a protected party to that party's dwelling or
residence, and to place the protected party in possession of that party's
dwelling or residence.

(c) Within twenty-four hours after its
issuance, a protective order issued pursuant to section 587A-38 shall be
transmitted by the clerk of the court to the appropriate county police
department. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next